Massachusetts, session 194th, H568.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 Section 38M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 official edition, is
hereby amended by striking the words “Said chairperson shall be an ex-officio, nonvoting
member of the school committee, without the right to attend executive sessions unless such right
is expressly granted by the individual school committee. Said chairperson shall be subject to all
school committee rules and regulations and shall serve without compensation.” in lines 9 through
14 and inserting in their place the following:
“School committees of cities, towns and regional school districts shall recognize two (2)
student representatives, to be elected by the student bodies of all secondary schools within the
district, prior to the first day of June in each year. Said representatives shall be allowed to vote
on all matters before the committee. Student representatives shall be subject to all school
of 2

committee rules and regulations, shall serve without compensation, and without the right to
attend executive sessions unless such right is expressly granted by the individual school
committee.
There shall also be a student advisory committee with members numbered as determined
by the district, to be elected by the students of the secondary school or schools within the district.
The purpose of said student advisory committee will be to assist the elected student
representatives with their regular duties and to assist their constituents with accessing resources
as well as connecting students with the student representatives.”
of 2